Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-106
Misdemeanors; classification of penalties; sentences; where served.

(1) For purposes of the Nebraska Criminal Code and any statute passed by the Legislature after the date of passage of the code, misdemeanors are divided into seven classes which are distinguished from one another by the following penalties which are authorized upon conviction:

Class I misdemeanor........Maximum—not more than one yearimprisonment, or one thousand dollarsfine, or bothMinimum—noneClass II misdemeanor.......Maximum—six months imprisonment, orone thousand dollars fine, or bothMinimum—noneClass III misdemeanor......Maximum—three months imprisonment,or five hundred dollars fine, or bothMinimum—noneClass IIIA misdemeanor.....Maximum—seven days imprisonment, fivehundred dollars fine, or bothMinimum—noneClass IV misdemeanor.......Maximum—no imprisonment, fivehundred dollars fineMinimum—noneClass V misdemeanor........Maximum—no imprisonment, onehundred dollars fineMinimum—noneClass W misdemeanor.......Driving under the influence or impliedconsentFirst conviction Maximum—sixty days imprisonment andfive hundred dollars fineMandatory minimum—seven daysimprisonment and five hundred dollarsfineSecond convictionMaximum—six months imprisonment andfive hundred dollars fineMandatory minimum—thirty daysimprisonment and five hundred dollarsfineThird conviction Maximum—one year imprisonment andone thousand dollars fineMandatory minimum—ninety daysimprisonmentand one thousand dollars fine

(2) Sentences of imprisonment in misdemeanor cases shall be served in the county jail, except that such sentences may be served in institutions under the jurisdiction of the Department of Correctional Services if the sentence is to be served concurrently or consecutively with a term for conviction of a felony and the combined sentences total a term of one year or more. A determinate sentence shall be imposed for a misdemeanor if the sentence is to be served concurrently or consecutively with a determinate sentence for a Class III, IIIA, or IV felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 6;

Laws 1982, LB 568, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 153, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 291, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 309, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 82, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 594, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB675, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 7;

Laws 2016, LB1094, § 3.

A determinate sentence, as used in subsection (2) of this section, is imposed when the defendant is sentenced to a single term of years. State v. Vanness, 300 Neb. 159, 912 N.W.2d 736 (2018).

The proper determination of punishment for fourth offense driving under the influence of an alcoholic liquor or drug is governed by subsection (1) of this section and not by section 28-107(3). State v. Schultz, 252 Neb. 746, 566 N.W.2d 739 (1997).

For a Class III misdemeanor, a sentence of five days in jail with a fine of three hundred dollars is within the statutory maximum and will not be disturbed on appeal absent an abuse of discretion. State v. Rosenberry, 209 Neb. 383, 307 N.W.2d 823 (1981).

A defendant's sentences on various misdemeanors needed to be indeterminate sentences pursuant to subsection (5) of section 29-2204.02, because the defendant was also sentenced on Class II felonies. State v. Wells, 28 Neb. App. 118, 940 N.W.2d 847 (2020).